District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.27

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue all rules necessary to carry out the purposes of § 7-1531.24 and § 7-1531.26. These rules shall include, at a minimum:

(1)

Standards for the training and qualification of those hospital and hospice representatives who have been designated to make consent requests pursuant to § 7-1531.24;

(2)

Procedures to be used when making consent requests under § 7-1531.24; and

(3)

Procedures to facilitate effective coordination among hospitals, hospices, other health-care facilities and agencies, organ and tissue banks, and procurement organizations.

History

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 28, 55 DCR 2532